Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 59 Council on Postsecondary Education [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]
16-59-11.
Investigative powers of board.

The council on postsecondary education shall have power to investigate all transactions and matters relating to higher public education in the state, including those required pursuant to an interstate, distance-learning reciprocity agreement, and to summon witnesses, administer oaths, and to require testimony and the production of records in like manner and to the same extent as a court of law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 207, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 231, § 2.

16-59-12.
Exemption from provisions of Administrative Procedures Act.

The provisions of the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42, shall not apply to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3.

16-59-13.
Definitions.

Where in this chapter the phrase “public colleges” or “public institutions of higher learning” or “public tax supported institutions of higher learning” or words of similar import are used they shall be taken to mean Rhode Island college, and the community college of Rhode Island, or any other of these public colleges, public institutions of higher learning, or public tax supported institutions of higher learning other than the university of Rhode Island, which may be created, individually or collectively, as appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 6.

16-59-14.
Pertinence of certain law relating to state colleges to board of governors.

The provisions of repealed §§ 16-31-8, 16-31-9, 16-31-10, 16-31-11, and 16-31-13 previously pertinent to the board of trustees of state colleges and made applicable to the board of governors for education are made applicable to the board of governors for higher education; provided, that §

16-59-23

shall not apply to members of the general assembly in their capacity as members of the board of governors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 12; P.L. 1993, ch. 422, § 4; P.L. 1994, ch. 14, § 4.

16-59-15.
Liberal construction of chapter required.

This chapter shall be construed liberally in aid of its declared purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3.

16-59-16.
Meaning of terms in existing law.

Whenin any law, resolution, document, record, instrument, proceeding, or other place the words “board of trustees of state colleges” or “boards of regents for education” as they shall apply to higher education shall appear, they shall be construed to mean “board of governors for higher education”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3.

16-59-17.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or of any rule or regulation made under this chapter, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of the chapter, rule, or regulation and the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected by this invalidity. The invalidity of any section or sections or parts of any section or sections shall not affect the validity of the remainder of the chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 3.

16-59-18.
Receipts from sources other than appropriations.

All receipts from all sources other than state appropriations shall not be covered into the general fund of the state, but shall be kept by the general treasurer of the state in a separate fund for the council on postsecondary education, and shall be paid out by the treasurer upon the order of the council, without the necessity of appropriation or re-appropriation by the general assembly.

The council on postsecondary education shall ensure that state colleges have a structure in place to prohibit these colleges from accepting funds that would interfere with or restrict academic freedom at the state colleges. Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed in a way as to prohibit a donor from earmarking funds for a particular purpose or use including but not limited to research, scholarships, construction, or development.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 122; P.L. 1999, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 6.

16-59-19.
Fiscal accounts — Receipts — Petty cash funds.

The treasurer of Rhode Island college to be appointed by the council on postsecondary education, shall keep an accurate account of his or her receipts and expenditures which shall be audited by the state controller in accordance with law. The treasurer of each college shall turn over to the general treasurer at monthly intervals all sums of money received by him or her during the preceding month which shall be credited to the proper accounts and funds by the general treasurer. The state controller shall establish an imprest fund or petty cash fund for the use of the treasurer of each of the colleges for expenditures of any nature as may be approved by the state controller.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 122; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 6.

16-59-20.
Audit of expenditures.

The pre-audit of all expenditures under authority of the board by the state controller provided for in §

35-6-1

shall be purely ministerial, concerned only with the legality of the expenditure and the availability of the funds, and in no event shall the state controller interpose his or her judgment regarding the wisdom or expediency of any item or items of expenditure.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 122.

16-59-21.
Freedom from budget and lease control by other agencies.

In order that the board of governors for higher education may control the personnel and equipment of the state colleges in the interest of educational efficiency, the board and the colleges are excepted from the provisions of subsection (a)(5) of §

35-3-1

relating to the employment of personnel, and from that part of §

42-20-8

which relates to the director of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 122.

16-59-22.
Applicability of merit system — Teacher certification — List of positions transferable to classified service.

The appointment, promotion, salaries, tenure, and dismissal of administrative, instructional, and research employees, and secretarial employees not exceeding ten (10) in number, and armed college police officers of the state colleges shall not be subject in any manner or degree to control by the personnel administrator or by any officer or board other than the council on postsecondary education.

All positions that are exempt from the merit system law, chapter 4 of title 36, which become vacant or that are to be established, must be forwarded to the personnel administrator, who, in consultation with the deputy assistant commissioner of education in charge of personnel and labor relations, shall determine whether the position(s) in question shall remain in the council on postsecondary education non-classified service or be established in the classified service of the state.

No position presently in the classified service of the state subject to the merit system law, chapter 4 of title 36, shall be changed or modified so as to establish the position in the council on postsecondary education non-classified service.

Faculty positions, presidents, vice presidents, deans, assistant deans, and student employees of the higher-education institutions shall not be covered by the preceding provisions and shall remain in the council on postsecondary education non-classified service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 122; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 5; P.L. 2016, ch. 391, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 405, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 6.

16-59-23.
Conflicts of interest.

No member of the board of governors for higher education shall be employed in any position under the jurisdiction of the board, nor contract in any manner for any purpose with the board; nor shall the board purchase, sell, or lease any land, property, or supplies from or to any firm or business association of which any member of the board is owner, part owner, or officer or director. No person related by consanguinity or affinity in the first degree to any member of the board shall be employed in any capacity under the board’s jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 122.

16-59-24.
Accessibility for people with disabilities.

The board of governors shall develop a policy, commitments, and procedures for students with disabilities setting forth the steps necessary to ensure that all public colleges, as defined in §

16-59-13

, are accessible to persons with disabilities.

The plan shall be substantially identical to the plan adopted by Rhode Island College and shall consider all persons’ with disabilities needs and shall adopt reasonable accommodations necessary to achieve equal participation in educational opportunities.

The state building code standards committee shall adopt an accessibility for people with disabilities standard for public colleges that includes provisions ensuring that public colleges are accessible to and usable by all persons with disabilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 236, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 36; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 36.

16-59-25.
Voter registration forms.

The admissions offices of all state institutions of higher learning shall include in the admissions information provided to state residents forms for voter registration as described in §

17-9.1-9

to be provided by the state board of elections.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 338, § 1.

16-59-25.1.
Maintenance of voter registration files.

In order to better maintain voter registration files, all institutions of higher education shall, on or before August 15th of each year, electronically transmit a text file or database to the secretary of state containing the names and current addresses of those students who have graduated that year and for whom public directory information is available. Within fifteen (15) days of the receipt of the file or database, the secretary of state may send a letter to each such student requesting verification as to whether such student intends to continue to reside in the State of Rhode Island.

The letter shall:

Request the student, if he or she has moved to a new address within Rhode Island, to complete a form, enclosed with the letter, allowing him or her to provide a new address for re-registration purposes;

Request the student, if he or she has moved to a new address outside of Rhode Island, to so advise the secretary of state on a form enclosed with the letter, authorizing his or her removal from the voter registration list;

Remind the student to re-register at a new address if he or she subsequently moves from their current address; and

Make clear that the request for information is strictly voluntary, that the student has no obligation to respond to the letter, and that no student shall be removed from the voter registration list unless such student responds to the mailing and authorizes his or her removal from the voter registration list.

Mailings conducted pursuant to this section shall not seek address correction from the postal service. In the event that a letter is nonetheless returned as undeliverable to the address where the letter was sent, it shall not serve as a basis for initiating the confirmation process established in §

17-9.1-26

.

The form letter used by the secretary of state to implement this provision shall be adopted in accordance with the rule-making provisions of chapter 35 of title 42 (The “Administrative Procedures Act”).

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 273, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 302, § 1.

16-59-26.
The public and private partnership in education.

Purpose. The state of Rhode Island recognizes that research is a primary mission of an institution of higher education. While carrying out its research mission, the state further recognizes that inventions of value to the public will be made by persons working in its public institutions of higher education. The marketing of these inventions will contribute to job creation and to the overall economic well-being of the state of Rhode Island and the nation. It is accordingly the policy of the state to encourage such inventors and inventions and to take appropriate steps to aid the inventor and ensure that the public receives the benefit. In facilitating this policy, the state recognizes the need for cooperation between governmental agencies, private industries, and the inventors themselves.

Definitions. The following words and phrases used in this section have the following meaning:

“Conflict of interest policies and procedures relating to research and development” refers to policies and procedures adopted by the council on postsecondary education, or as it pertains to the university of Rhode Island, the board of trustees, in consultation with the Rhode Island ethics commission, and approved by the Rhode Island ethics commission;

“Relationship” includes any interest, service, employment, gift, or other benefit or relationship;

“Research or development” means basic or applied research or development, including:

The development or marketing of university-owned technology;

The acquisition of services of an official or employee, by an entity for research and development purposes;

Participation in state economic development programs; or

The development or marketing of any technology on the premises of a public institution of higher education by an official or employee of the institution.

Policy.

The council on postsecondary education, or as it pertains to the university of Rhode Island, the board of trustees shall develop conflict of interest policies and procedures based on the purposes expressed in

R.I. Const., Art. III, Sec. VII

, §

36-14-1

, and in this section.

The council on postsecondary education, or as it pertains to the university of Rhode Island, the board of trustees, shall consult with the Rhode Island ethics commission in developing these policies and procedures and shall submit them to the Rhode Island ethics commission for approval in order to insure conformity with the purposes expressed in

R.I. Const., Art. III, Sec. VII

, §

36-14-1

, and in this section.

Policy standards. The policies and procedures adopted by the council on postsecondary education, or as it pertains to the university of Rhode Island, the board of trustees under subsection (c) of this section shall:

Require disclosure of any interest in, or employment by, or other relationship with an entity for which an exemption under this section is claimed, on a form filed with the ethics commission and the council on postsecondary education, or as it pertains to the university of Rhode Island, the board of trustees and maintained as a public record at the commission offices, the office of higher education, and at the interested public institution of higher education;

Require review of all disclosures by a designated official or officials, who shall determine what further information must be disclosed and what restrictions shall be imposed by the council on postsecondary education, or as it pertains to the university of Rhode Island, the board of trustees to manage, reduce, or eliminate any actual or potential conflict of interest;

Include guidelines to ensure that interests and employment for which an exemption under this section is claimed do not improperly give an advantage to entities in which the interests or employment are maintained, lead to misuse of institution students or employees for the benefit of entities in which the interests or employment are maintained, or otherwise interfere with the duties and responsibilities of the exempt official or employee;

Require approval by the president of the public institution of higher education of any interest or employment for which an exemption is claimed under this section; and

Require approval by the council on postsecondary education, or as it pertains to the university of Rhode Island, the board of trustees.

Relationship permitted. An official or employee at a public institution of higher education may have a relationship, that would otherwise be prohibited by the Rhode Island code of ethics in government, with an entity engaged in research or development, or with an entity having a direct interest in the outcome of research or development, only if the council on postsecondary education, or as it pertains to the university of Rhode Island, the board of trustees has adopted policies and procedures in accordance with this section, and the official or employee has complied with the policies and procedures. If the provisions of this section are not met, the official or employee is not exempt from any relevant provisions of the Rhode Island code of ethics in government.

Annual reporting. The council on postsecondary education, or as it pertains to the university of Rhode Island, the board of trustees shall report annually to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives, and the ethics commission the number of approvals granted under this section and how the conflict of interest policies and procedures adopted pursuant to this section have been implemented in the preceding year.

Person not eligible. An official or employee who is a president, or vice-president at a public institution of higher education in Rhode Island may not receive an exemption under this section.

Ethics commission review. The council on postsecondary education, or as it pertains to the university of Rhode Island, the board of trustees, shall promptly notify the ethics commission in writing of any exemption that is granted under this section. If the ethics commission disagrees with an exemption that is granted pursuant to this section and the conflict of interest policies and procedures relating to research and development adopted by the council on postsecondary education, within thirty (30) calendar days after the receipt of the notice described in this section, the ethics commission shall notify the council on postsecondary education reason for its concern. Upon receipt of such notice from the ethics commission, the council on postsecondary education, or as it pertains to the university of Rhode Island, the board of trustees shall cause the matter to be re-examined at an open and public meeting pursuant to §

42-46-1

et seq.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 154, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 6.

16-59-27.
Sale and purchase of degrees solely on the basis of life experience prohibited.

The purchase and sale of academic degrees wherein the degree is obtained on the basis of a combination of a payment of a fee and the attainment of academic credit for so-called life experiences, without the applicant undertaking any academic coursework at the entity or institution purporting to issue the degree, shall be prohibited. Provided, this section shall not prohibit an award of academic credit for work experience or other so-called “life experience” as part of a program to obtain a degree in higher education, but shall prohibit the award of such degree solely on the basis of such experience.

Pursuant to its investigative powers under §

16-59-11

, the board of governors shall investigate persons and entities brought to the board’s attention that purport to offer academic degrees in violation of this section. By way of direction, and as a guide in enforcing this section, the general assembly notes that higher education can take many forms, and it is not the intent of this section to curtail or limit academic freedom and/or the use of alternative methods of instruction that deviate from traditional norms. Rather, the intent of this section is to prohibit the awarding and attainment of academic degrees primarily on the basis of purchase and sale, and to prevent the fraudulent use of life and work experience to attain academic credit.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 405, § 1.

16-59-28.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 202, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 203, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 75, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 7, effective February 1, 2020.